Wisconsin, session 2025, SB210.
do enact as follows:SB210,11Section 1. 39.41 (1) (bm) of the statutes is amended to read:SB210,2,7239.41 (1) (bm) “Senior” means a pupil enrolled in the 12th grade in a public or 3private high school, a tribal school, the school operated by the Wisconsin 4Educational Services Program for the Deaf and Hard of Hearing, or the school 5operated by the Wisconsin Center for the Blind and Visually Impaired. “Senior” 6does not include a pupil enrolled in a home-based private educational program, as 7defined in s.115.001 (3g).SB210,28Section 2. 39.41 (1m) (a) 1. of the statutes is amended to read:SB210,2,11939.41 (1m) (a) 1. For each high school with an enrollment of at least 80 pupils 10one pupil but less than 500 pupils, designate the senior with the highest grade 11point average in all subjects as a scholar.SB210,312Section 3. 39.41 (1m) (b) of the statutes is repealed.SB210,413Section 4. 39.41 (1m) (c) 3. of the statutes is repealed.SB210,514Section 5. 39.41 (1m) (c) 4. of the statutes is amended to read:SB210,3,21539.41 (1m) (c) 4. For each public, private, or tribal high school with an 16enrollment of at least 80 pupils, one pupil, notify the school board of the school 1district operating the public high school or the governing body of the private or 2tribal high school of the number of scholars to be designated under par. (a).SB210,63Section 6. 39.41 (1m) (c) 5. of the statutes is repealed.SB210,74Section 7. 39.41 (1m) (d) of the statutes is amended to read:SB210,3,24539.41 (1m) (d) By February 25 of each school year, if 2 or more seniors from 6the same high school of at least 80 pupils one pupil have the same grade point 7average and, except for the limitation on the number of designated scholars, are 8otherwise eligible for designation under par. (a), the faculty of the high school shall 9select the applicable number of seniors for designation under par. (a) as scholars 10and shall certify, in order of priority, any remaining seniors with the same grade 11point average as alternates for the scholars or, if there is no remaining senior with 12the same grade point average, any remaining seniors with the next highest grade 13point average, but not less than 3.800 or the equivalent, as alternates for the 14scholars. If a senior from that high school designated as a scholar under par. (a) 15does not qualify for a higher education scholarship under sub. (2) (a) or (3) (a), an 16alternate for the scholar with the same grade point average as any senior from that 17high school designated as a scholar under par. (a) shall be eligible for a higher 18education scholarship as a scholar under sub. (2) (a) or (3) (a) until the scholarship 19may be awarded by the board. If an alternate with the same grade point average as 20a scholar under par. (a) does not qualify for a higher education scholarship under 21sub. (2) (a) or (3) (a), an alternate with the next highest grade point average, but not 22less than 3.800 or the equivalent, shall be eligible for a higher education scholarship 23as a scholar under sub. (2) (a) or (3) (a) until the scholarship may be awarded by the 24board.SB210,81Section 8. 39.41 (1m) (e) of the statutes is repealed.SB210,92Section 9. 39.41 (1m) (g) of the statutes is amended to read:SB210,4,11339.41 (1m) (g) Notwithstanding par. (a), if a high school of at least 80 pupils 4one pupil closes or merges in the 1991-92 school year or in any school year 5thereafter, the school board of the school district operating the high school or the 6governing body of the private or tribal high school shall, subject to par. (d), for each 7of the 2 school years following the closure or merger, designate the same number of 8scholars from among the pupils enrolled in the high school at the time of closure or 9merger as the number of scholars designated for that high school in the school year 10the high school closed or merged. Any seniors designated under this paragraph 11shall be eligible for an original scholarship under this section.SB210,1012Section 10. 39.41 (1m) (h) of the statutes is amended to read:SB210,4,231339.41 (1m) (h) Notwithstanding par. (a), if a public high school of at least 80 14pupils one pupil closed following the 1989-90 school year and a pupil from the closed 15high school was designated a scholar under this section for either of the 2 school 16years following the closure by the school board of a school district operating a high 17school that enrolled pupils from the closed high school, such school board shall 18designate the senior with the next highest grade point average for that school year 19as a scholar. Any scholar designated under this paragraph shall be eligible for a 20higher education scholarship under sub. (2) (b) or (3) (b) as determined under par. 21(a), notwithstanding that the scholar did not receive a higher education scholarship 22for the academic year immediately following the school year in which the pupil from 23the closed high school was designated a scholar under this section.SB210,1124Section 11. 39.41 (1m) (j) of the statutes is amended to read:SB210,5,6139.41 (1m) (j) In the event that 2 or more seniors from the same high school of 2at least 80 pupils one pupil have the same grade point average and are otherwise 3eligible for designation under par. (a), the school board of the school district 4operating the high school or the governing body of the private or tribal high school 5shall make the designation of the faculty of the high school for purposes of par. (d) or 6(i).SB210,127Section 12. 39.41 (1m) (m) of the statutes is amended to read:SB210,5,13839.41 (1m) (m) Notwithstanding pars. (a), (b) (a) and (d), if a high school 9ranks its seniors on the basis of grades in academic subjects, the school board of the 10school district operating the high school or the governing body of the private high 11school or, for purposes of par. (d), the faculty of the high school may request a waiver 12from the executive secretary in order to fulfill its requirements under par. (a), (b) (a) 13or (d) on the basis of grade point averages in academic subjects.SB210,1314Section 13. 39.41 (8) of the statutes is repealed.SB210,5,1515